Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 7.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201469-2431
Fingerprinting;
criminal history record information check.

In order
to insure an applicant's initial compliance with sections 69-2430 and 69-2433,
the applicant for a permit to carry a concealed handgun shall be fingerprinted
by the Nebraska State Patrol and a check made of his or her criminal history
record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation through
the Nebraska State Patrol. In order to insure continuing compliance with sections
69-2430 and 69-2433 and compliance for renewal pursuant to section 69-2436,
a check shall be made of a permitholder's criminal history record information
through the National Instant Criminal Background Check System.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB817, § 7.